Tennessee, session 114, HB2157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-123(d)(2), is amended by
deleting "ten (10) days" and substituting instead "ten (10) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2157
012398
- 1 -